Utah statutes.
10-9a-512.   Termination of a billboard and associated rights.

(1)  A municipality may only require termination of a billboard and associated property rights through:

(a)  gift;

(b)  purchase;

(c)  agreement;

(d)  exchange; or

(e)  eminent domain.

(2)  A termination under Subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), or (d) requires the voluntary consent of the billboard owner.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

